Washington statutes.
RCW 13.50.160

Disposition records—Provision to schools.

Records of disposition for a juvenile offense must be provided to schools as provided in RCW 13.04.155.

[ 1997 c 266 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—1997 c 266: See notes following RCW 28A.600.455.